Louisiana, session 2026, HB813.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5581(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5581. Sheriff for parish of Orleans; election; term
A. There shall be one sheriff for the parish of Orleans, who shall be elected
by the qualified electors of the parish of Orleans. He shall be elected at the election
for parochial and municipal officers in Orleans Parish, and shall serve for a term of
four years, and shall take office and begin his term on the first Monday in May
following his election. However, the sheriff elected at the election for parochial and
municipal officers in Orleans Parish in 2029 shall serve until his successor takes
office on January 9, 2034. Each sheriff elected thereafter shall take office on the
second Monday in January following election.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.